Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB132.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 158.033 is amended to read as follows:
(1) If in any district there are students not able even with the help of transportation to be assembled in a school,
instruction shall be provided to the student in the student's home or in a hospital.
(2) For a student to be eligible for home or hospital instruction, a signed statement of the diagnosed condition
requiring home or hospital instruction shall be provided in accordance with KRS 159.030(2).
(3) For a student admitted to an inpatient facility, the student may receive home or hospital instruction effective
on the day of admittance. Nothing in this subsection shall exempt a board of education from the
documentation requirements of KRS 159.030(2)(a).
(4) For the purposes of KRS 157.360, a student instructed under this section who receives a minimum of two (2)
instructional sessions a week with a minimum of one (1) hour of instruction per session by a certified teacher
provided by the board of education shall equal the student attending five (5) days in school.
(5)[(4)] For students with disabilities, the admissions and release committee shall be responsible for placement
decisions regarding home or hospital instruction in accordance with the Individuals with Disabilities Education
Act, 20 U.S.C. sec.[secs.] 1400 et. seq. The home or hospital instruction shall be provided pursuant to the
individual education program as determined by the admissions and release committee. For the purposes of
KRS 157.360, students receiving home or hospital instruction under this subsection may be counted in
attendance in accordance with subsection (4)[(3)] of this section.
(6)[(5)] The Kentucky Board of Education shall promulgate administrative regulations to establish the
components of home or hospital instruction.
(7)[(6)] An instructional session may be delivered in person, electronically, or through other means established
in regulation.
Signed by Governor March 18, 2025.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version